California, session 20252026, AB249.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) The Homeless Housing, Assistance, and Prevention program (Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 50216) and Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 50230) of Part 1 of Division 31 of the Health and Safety Code) is a multi-round multiround grant program administered by the Department of Housing and Community Development. Commencing with Round 3 of the Homeless Housing, Assistance, and Prevention program, applicants have been asked to prioritize their funding to make homelessness response systems improvements. Specifically, existing law indicates that applicants could use their funding to create a youth-specific coordinated entry system.(b) Youth-specific coordinated entry systems allow youth to be assessed against other youth, rather than against adults, including chronically homeless adults, whose time on the street will always place them above youth if vulnerability is measured by time spent on the street and overall health. Further, youth need housing options that meet their developmentally appropriate needs, which would include a mix of rapid rehousing, time-limited or interim housing, and permanent supportive housing. (c) In the 2023 Annual Homelessness Assessment Report to Congress from the federal Department of Housing and Urban Development, California reported the largest number of unaccompanied youth (10,173 people), accounting for more than a fourth of all unaccompanied youth nationally (29 percent), with 68.2 percent of these youth being unsheltered.SEC. 2. Section 50245 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:50245. (a) Upon appropriation, and beginning with the 2026–27 fiscal year, the department shall require a continuum of care to annually certify that they do all of the following:(1) Create or maintain a documented, youth-specific process with their respective coordinated entry system. This process shall specify all of the following:(A) How youth are matched to youth-specific resources.(B) The means by which youth can access the coordinated entry system, which shall include factors in addition to length of time experiencing homelessness.(C) How youth accessing the coordinated entry system through adult or family programs can access youth-specific supports.(2) Implement a youth-specific assessment tool that considers the unique needs of youth experiencing homelessness and the unique presentation of homelessness among youth.(3) Create a body or identify an existing body composed of youth with lived experience of homelessness that the continuum of care and other Homeless Housing, Assistance, and Prevention Program program grantees shall consult with regularly to receive input on policies, program design, and implementation of interventions for youth.(4) Create Identify an array of youth-specific housing inventory to align with the needs of youth in their region.(b) If a continuum of care states that they already maintain a youth-specific coordinated entry system, the continuum of care shall document all of the following in their application:(1) How the continuum of care’s housing assessment is youth-specific, including how the assessment is trauma-informed.(2) The continuum of care’s prioritization policy.(c) For purposes of this section, “youth-specific” means for a homeless youth as defined in Section 8260 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.